Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1126
Act; to whom applicable; Division of Vocational Rehabilitation; duties.

The Special Education Act applies to a child with a disability from the date of diagnosis or the date of notification of the school district of residence to age twenty-one and, if the child's twenty-first birthday occurs during a school year, until the end of that school year. All provisions of state law related to special education which apply to a child with a disability who is age twenty shall apply to a child with a disability whose twenty-first birthday occurs during a school year until the end of that school year. The Division of Vocational Rehabilitation of the State Department of Education shall, in compliance with federal guidelines, assume responsibility for the training of those individuals whose education or training is terminated and for whom additional supportive services are required.

Laws 1973, LB 403, § 6;

Laws 1976, LB 761, § 8;

Laws 1978, LB 889, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 43-646;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 15;

Laws 1990, LB 1090, § 40;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3315;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 808;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 16.

The age of twenty-one years is reached upon a person's twenty-first birthday, and, therefore, the term "to age twenty-one years" excludes any persons who have reached their twenty-first birthday. Monahan v. School Dist. No. 1, 229 Neb. 139, 425 N.W.2d 624 (1988).